Utah statutes.
77-23a-4.5.   Implanting an electronic identification device -- Penalties.

(1)  A person may not require, coerce, or compel any other individual to undergo or submit to the subcutaneous implanting of a radio frequency identification tag.

(2)  Any person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(3) (a)  A person who is implanted with a subcutaneous identification device in violation of Subsection (1) may bring a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction for actual damages, compensatory damages, punitive damages, injunctive relief, or any combination of these.

(b)  The initial civil penalty may not be more than $10,000, and no more than $1,000 for each day the violation continues until the electronic identification device is removed or disabled.

